Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5611XS (3) 91 sc/ns S.F. 2120 Section 1. Section 97B.52A, subsection 1, paragraph c, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended by adding the following 2 new subparagraph division: 3 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (e) For a member whose first 4 month of entitlement is July 2026 or later, the member may 5 return to covered employment as school district support staff 6 or a coach for a covered employer after receiving one month of 7 retirement benefits. 8